Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 2 State-wide Probation System
42-8-35.2.
Special term of probation; when imposed; revocation; suspension.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the court, when imposing a sentence of imprisonment after a conviction of a violation of subsection (b) or (d) of Code Section 16-13-30 or after a conviction of a violation of Code Section 16-13-31, shall impose a special term of probation of three years in addition to such term of imprisonment; provided, however, that upon a second or subsequent conviction of a violation of the provisions of such Code sections, the special term of probation shall be six years in addition to any term of imprisonment.

A special term of probation imposed under this Code section may be revoked if the terms and conditions of probation are violated. In such circumstances the original term of imprisonment shall be increased by the period of the special term of probation and the resulting new term of imprisonment shall not be diminished by the time which was spent on special probation. A person whose special term of probation has been revoked may be required to serve all or part of the remainder of the new term of imprisonment. A special term of probation provided for in this Code section shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other probation provided for by law and shall be supervised in the same manner as other probations as provided in this chapter.

Upon written application by the probationer to the trial court, the court may, in its discretion, suspend the balance of any special term of probation, provided that at least one-half of such special term of probation has been completed and all fines associated with the original sentence have been paid and all other terms of the original sentence and the terms of the special probation have been met by the probationer.

History.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 2283, § 1; Code 1981, §

42-8-35.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2283, § 2; Code 1981, §

42-8-35.2

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 31; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 42; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (a), in the proviso, inserted “that” and deleted “as stated in this subsection” following “Code sections”; and substituted “such special” for “said special” in the middle of subsection (c). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

The 1983 amendment, effective January 25, 1983, redesignated this Code section, which was enacted as Code Section 42-8-35.1, as Code Section 42-8-35.2, since Ga. L. 1982, p. 1097, § 2 also enacted a Code Section 42-8-35.1, and revised language.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-35.3.
Conditions of probation for stalking or aggravated stalking.

Notwithstanding any other terms or conditions of probation which may be imposed, a court sentencing a defendant to probation for a violation of Code Section 16-5-90 or 16-5-91 may impose one or more of the following conditions on such probation:

Prohibit the defendant from engaging in conduct in violation of Code Section 16-5-90 or 16-5-91;

Require the defendant to undergo a mental health evaluation and, if it is determined by the court from the results of such evaluation that the defendant is in need of treatment or counseling, require the defendant to undergo mental health treatment or counseling by a court approved mental health professional, mental health facility, or facility of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities. Unless the defendant is indigent, the cost of any such treatment shall be borne by the defendant; or

Prohibit the defendant from entering or remaining present at the victim’s school, place of employment, or other specified places at times when the victim is present.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-35.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1534, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310, effective July 1, 2015, reenacted this Code section without change.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For note on 1993 enactment of this Code section, see 10 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 95 (1993).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-35.4.
Confinement in probation detention center.

Notwithstanding any other terms and conditions of probation which may be imposed, a court may require that a defendant convicted of a felony and sentenced to a period of not less than one year on probation or a defendant who has been previously sentenced to probation for a forcible misdemeanor as defined in paragraph (7) of Code Section 16-1-3 or a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and has violated probation or other probation alternatives and is subsequently sentenced to a period of not less than one year on probation shall complete satisfactorily, as a condition of such probation, a program of confinement, not to exceed 180 days, in a probation detention center. Probationers so sentenced shall be required to serve the period of confinement, not to exceed 180 days, specified in the court order.

The court shall determine that the defendant is at least 17 years of age at the time of sentencing.

During the period of confinement, the Department of Corrections may transfer the probationer to other facilities in order to provide needed physical and mental health care or for other reasons essential to the care and supervision of the probationer or as necessary for the effective administration and management of its facilities.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-35.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 627, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 99, § 1/HB 226; Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 7-9/HB 1176; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in subsection (a), inserted “, not to exceed 180 days,” in the first and second sentences and substituted “shall be required” for “will be required” in the second sentence. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (a), in the first sentence, substituted “Notwithstanding any other terms and conditions of probation which may be imposed, a court” for “In addition to any other terms and conditions of probation provided for in this article, the trial judge” at the beginning, and substituted “such probation” for “that probation” near the end; and substituted “Department of Corrections” for “department” in subsection (c). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 99, § 2/HB 226, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section shall apply to probationers sentenced on or after July 1, 2009.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 9-1(a)/HB 1176, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, and shall apply to offenses which occur on or after that date.
Any offense occurring before July 1, 2012, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior conviction for the purpose of imposing a sentence that provides for a different penalty for a subsequent conviction for the same type of offense, of whatever degree or level, pursuant to this Act.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 290 (2012).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-35.5.
[Repealed] Confinement in probation diversion center.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-35.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 627, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310; repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 8-6/SB 367, effective July 1, 2016.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 repeal of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-35.6.
Family violence intervention program participation as condition of probation; cost borne by defendant.

Notwithstanding any other terms or conditions of probation which may be imposed, a court sentencing a defendant to probation for an offense involving family violence as such term is defined in Code Section 19-13-10 shall require as a condition of probation that the defendant participate in a family violence intervention program certified pursuant to Article 1A of Chapter 13 of Title 19, unless the court determines and states on the record why participation in such a program is not appropriate.

A court, in addition to imposing any penalty provided by law, when revoking a defendant’s probation for an offense involving family violence as defined by Code Section 19-13-10, or when imposing a protective order against family violence, shall order the defendant to participate in a family violence intervention program certified pursuant to Article 1A of Chapter 13 of Title 19, unless the court determines and states on the record why participation in such program is not appropriate.

The State Board of Pardons and Paroles, for a violation of parole for an offense involving family violence as defined by Code Section 19-13-10, shall require the conditional releasee to participate in a family violence intervention program certified pursuant to Article 1A of Chapter 13 of Title 19, unless the State Board of Pardons and Paroles determines why participation in such a program is not appropriate.

Unless the defendant is indigent, the cost of the family violence intervention program as provided by this Code section shall be borne by the defendant. If the defendant is indigent, then the cost of the program shall be determined by a sliding scale based upon the defendant’s ability to pay.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-35.6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 1113, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1435, § 6; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 1435, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia’s Family Violence Intervention Program Certification Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2002, p. 1435, § 7, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendments to this Code section shall apply to sentences or conditional release revocations that occur on or after July 1, 2003. Sentinel Offender Services, LLC v. Glover, No. S14A1271, S14X1272,

296 Ga. 315

,

766 S.E.2d 456

, 2014 Ga. LEXIS 967 (2014).

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310, effective July 1, 2015, reenacted this Code section without change.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-35.7.
Drug and alcohol screening of probationers.

Unless the court or State Board of Pardons and Paroles has ordered more frequent screenings, drug and alcohol screenings shall be administered in accordance with DCS rules and regulations.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-35.7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 775, § 5; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “Unless the court has ordered more frequent such screenings, it shall be the duty of each probation supervisor to administer or have administered a drug and alcohol screening not less than once every 60 days to any person who is placed on probation and who, as a condition of such probation, is required to undergo regular, random drug and alcohol screenings, provided that the drug and alcohol screenings required by this Code section shall be performed only to the extent that necessary funds therefor are appropriated in the state budget.” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Cross references.

Drug free workplace programs, T. 34, C. 9, A. 11. Sentinel Offender Services, LLC v. Glover, No. S14A1271, S14X1272,

296 Ga. 315

,

766 S.E.2d 456

, 2014 Ga. LEXIS 967 (2014).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-36.
Duty of probationer to inform officer of residence and whereabouts; violations; tolling; unpaid moneys.

It shall be the duty of a probationer, as a condition of probation, to keep his or her officer informed as to his or her residence. Upon the recommendation of the officer, the court may also require, as a condition of probation and under such terms as the court deems advisable, that the probationer keep the officer informed as to his or her whereabouts.

The running of a probated sentence shall be tolled upon:

The failure of a probationer to report to his or her officer as directed or failure to appear in court for a probation revocation hearing; either of such failures may be evidenced by an affidavit from the officer setting forth such failure; or

The filing of a return of non est inventus or other return to a warrant, for the violation of the terms and conditions of probation, that the probationer cannot be found in the county that appears from the records of the officer to be the probationer’s county of residence. Any officer authorized by law to issue or serve warrants may return the warrant for the absconded probationer showing non est inventus.

The effective date of the tolling of the sentence shall be the date the court enters a tolling order and shall continue until the probationer shall personally report to the officer, is taken into custody in this state, or is otherwise available to the court. The clerk of court shall transmit a copy of a tolling order to the Georgia Crime Information Center within 30 days of the filing of such order.

Any tolled period of time shall not be included in computing creditable time served on probation or as any part of the time that the probationer was sentenced to serve.

Any unpaid fines, restitution, or any other moneys owed as a condition of probation shall be due when the probationer is arrested; but, if the entire balance of his or her probation is revoked, all the conditions of probation, including moneys owed, shall be negated by the probationer’s imprisonment. If only part of the balance of the probation is revoked, the probationer shall still be responsible for the full amount of the unpaid fines, restitution, and other moneys upon his or her return to probation after release from imprisonment.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 15, § 9; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 42; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1317, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 492, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 455, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 452, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 42; Ga. L. 2010, p. 557, § 1/HB 859; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 6B-8/SB 367.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “officer” for “probation supervisor” throughout this Code section; in subsection (b), inserted “or her” twice, and substituted “the probationer’s” for “his” in the first sentence. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, added the last sentence in paragraph (a)(3).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article, “A Review of Georgia’s Probation Laws,” see 6 Ga. St. B.J. 255 (1970).

For note on 1989 amendment of this Code section, see 6 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 287 (1989).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-37.
Effect of termination of probated portion of sentence; review of cases of persons receiving probated sentence; reports.

Upon the termination of the probated portion of a sentence, the probationer shall be released from probation and shall not be liable to sentence for the crime for which probation was allowed; provided, however, that the foregoing shall not be construed to prohibit the conviction and sentencing of the probationer for the subsequent commission of the same or a similar offense or for the subsequent continuation of the offense for which he or she was previously sentenced.

The court may at any time cause the probationer to appear before it to be admonished or commended and, when satisfied that its action would be for the best interest of justice and the welfare of society, may discharge the probationer from further supervision.

The case of each person receiving a probated sentence of three years or more shall be reviewed by the officer responsible for such case after service of three years on probation, and a written report of the probationer’s progress shall be submitted to the sentencing court along with the officer’s recommendation as to early termination. The report shall specifically state whether the probationer has been arrested for anything other than a nonserious traffic offense as defined in Code Section 35-3-37, whether the probationer has had his or her probation revoked in the immediately preceding 24 months, and the status of the probationer’s payments toward any restitution imposed. Each such case shall be reviewed and a written report submitted annually thereafter until the termination, expiration, or other disposition of the case. If early termination is recommended in the written report, DCS shall notify the prosecuting attorney and simultaneously provide the court with an order to terminate such probation. The court shall execute the order to terminate unless the court or the prosecuting attorney requests a hearing on such matter within 30 days of the receipt of such order. The court shall set the matter for a hearing as soon as possible but not more than 90 days after receiving the order to terminate. The court shall take whatever action it determines would be for the best interest of justice and the welfare of society.

This subsection is intended to be retroactive and applied to any probationer under the supervision of DCS.

When a probationer is on probation for a qualified offense, DCS shall provide the court with an order to terminate his or her probation if, after serving three years on probation, the probationer has:

Paid all restitution owed;

Not had his or her probation revoked in the immediately preceding 24 months; and

Not been arrested for anything other than a nonserious traffic offense as defined in Code Section 35-3-37.

When the court is presented with such order, it shall execute the order to terminate unless the court or the prosecuting attorney requests a hearing on such matter within 30 days of the receipt of such order. The court shall set the matter for a hearing as soon as possible but not more than 90 days after receiving the order to terminate. The court shall take whatever action it determines would be for the best interest of justice and the welfare of society.

This subsection is intended to be retroactive and applied to any probationer under the supervision of DCS.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 11; Ga. L. 1972, p. 604, § 9; Ga. L. 1985, p. 516, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 7-10/HB 1176; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2017, p. 585, § 2-8/SB 174; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 2-13/SB 407; Ga. L. 2021, p. 223, § 2/SB 105.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in subsection (a), substituted “probated portion of a sentence” for “period of probation”, inserted “that” near the middle, and inserted “or she” near the end; designated the former second sentence of subsection (a) as present subsection (b); redesignated former subsection (b) as present subsection (c), and, in subsection (c), substituted “The” for “Upon the request of the chief judge of the court from which said person was sentenced, the” in the first sentence, in the second sentence, substituted “Each” for “Upon the request of the chief judge of the court from which said person was sentenced, each”, and deleted “, or more often if required,” following “thereafter”. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “interest” for “interests” in subsection (b); in subsection (c), in the first sentence, substituted “officer responsible for such case” for “probation supervisor responsible for that case” and substituted “officer’s” for “supervisor’s” near the end. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, designated the existing provisions of subsection (c) as paragraph (c)(1); in paragraph (c)(1), in the first sentence, substituted “three years or more” for “more than two years” near the beginning and substituted “three years” for “two years” near the middle, and added the last sentence; added paragraph (c)(2); and added subsection (d).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added the second sentence of paragraph (d)(2).

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 3, 2021, rewrote subsections (c) and (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 9-1(a)/HB 1176, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, and shall apply to offenses which occur on or after that date.
Any offense occurring before July 1, 2012, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior conviction for the purpose of imposing a sentence that provides for a different penalty for a subsequent conviction for the same type of offense, of whatever degree or level, pursuant to this Act.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 290 (2012).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 115 (2017).

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 45 (2018).

For annual survey on criminal law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 63 (2018).

42-8-38.
Arrest or graduated sanctions for probationers violating terms; hearing; disposition of charge; procedure when probation revoked in county other than that of conviction.

Whenever, within the period of probation, an officer believes that a probationer under his or her supervision has violated the terms of probation in a material respect, if graduated sanctions have been made a condition of probation by the court, the officer may impose graduated sanctions as set forth in Code Section 42-8-23 to address the specific conduct leading to such violation or, if the circumstances warrant, may arrest the probationer without warrant, wherever found, and return the probationer to the court granting the probation or, if under supervision in a county or judicial circuit other than that of conviction, to a court of equivalent original criminal jurisdiction within the county wherein the probationer resides for purposes of supervision. Any officer authorized by law to issue warrants may issue a warrant for the arrest of the probationer upon the affidavit of one having knowledge of the alleged violation, returnable forthwith before the court in which revocation proceedings are being brought.

The court, upon the probationer being brought before it, may commit the probationer or release the probationer with or without bail to await further hearing, or it may dismiss the charge. If the charge is not dismissed at this time, the court shall give the probationer an opportunity to be heard fully at the earliest possible date on his or her own behalf, in person or by counsel, provided that, if the revocation proceeding is in a court other than the court of the original criminal conviction, the sentencing court shall be given ten days’ written notice prior to a hearing on the merits.

After the hearing, the court may revoke, modify, or continue the probation. If the probation is revoked, the court may order the execution of the sentence originally imposed or of any portion thereof. In such event, the time that the defendant has served under probation shall be considered as time served and shall be deducted from and considered a part of the time he or she was originally sentenced to serve.

In cases where the probation is revoked in a county other than the county of original conviction, the clerk of court in the county revoking probation may record the order of revocation in the minutes of the court, which recordation shall constitute sufficient permanent record of the proceedings in such court. The clerk shall send copies of the order revoking probation to DCS and the Department of Corrections to serve as a temporary commitment and shall send the original order revoking probation and all other papers pertaining thereto to the county of original conviction to be filed with the original records. The clerk of court of the county of original conviction shall then issue a formal commitment to the Department of Corrections.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 12; Ga. L. 1960, p. 857, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 440, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 7-11/HB 1176; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in the first sentence of subsection (a), twice inserted “or her” near the beginning, substituted “respect, if graduated sanctions have been made a condition of probation by the court, the probation supervisor may impose graduated sanctions as set forth in Code Section 42-8-23 to address the specific conduct leading to such violation or, if the circumstances warrant, may” for “respect, he may”, and substituted “return the probationer” for “return him”. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (a), in the first sentence, substituted “an officer” for “a probation supervisor” near the beginning, substituted “violated the terms of probation” for “violated his or her probation” near the middle, substituted “officer” for “probation supervisor” in the middle; in subsection (b), in the first sentence, substituted “the probationer” for “him” twice, and added a comma following “hearing”, inserted “or her” in the second sentence; inserted “or she” in the last sentence of subsection (c); and in subsection (d), in the first sentence, substituted “minutes of the court” for “judge’s minute docket” in the middle, and substituted “such court” for “that court” near the end, substituted “DCS and the Department of Corrections” for “the department” in the second sentence, and substituted “Department of Corrections” for “department” in the last sentence. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 9-1(a)/HB 1176, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, and shall apply to offenses which occur on or after that date.
Any offense occurring before July 1, 2012, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior conviction for the purpose of imposing a sentence that provides for a different penalty for a subsequent conviction for the same type of offense, of whatever degree or level, pursuant to this Act.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article, “A Review of Georgia’s Probation Laws,” see 6 Ga. St. B.J. 255 (1970).

For comment criticizing Mercer v. Hopper,

233 Ga. 620

,

212 S.E.2d 799

(1975), see 27 Mercer L. Rev. 325 (1975).

For survey article on criminal law and procedure for the period from June 1, 2002 through May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 117 (2003).

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 290 (2012).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-39.
Suspension of sentence does not place defendant on probation.

In all criminal cases in which the defendant is found guilty or in which a plea of guilty or of nolo contendere is entered and in which the court after imposing sentence further provides that the execution of the sentence shall be suspended, such provision shall not have the effect of placing the defendant on probation as provided in this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 13; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1148, § 2; Ga. L. 1965, p. 413, § 4; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “court” for “trial judge” in the middle of this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-40.
Confidentiality of reports, files, records, and other information related to supervision; exemption from subpoena; declassification.

All reports, files, records, and information of whatever kind relative to the supervision of probationers and parolees are declared to be confidential and shall be available only to the probation system officials, the judge handling a particular case, the Board of Community Supervision, DCS, the Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, and the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, as appropriate. Such reports, files, records, and information shall not be subject to process of subpoena; provided, however, that the commissioner of community supervision may by written order declassify any such records.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 19; Ga. L. 1958, p. 15, § 11; Ga. L. 2003, p. 421, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 620, § 1/SB 214; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Cross references.

Inspection of public records generally, §

50-18-70

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-41.
Cooperation of state and local entities with probation officials.

All state and local departments, agencies, boards, bureaus, commissions, and committees shall cooperate with officers.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 17; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “officers” for “the probation officials” in this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-42.
Provision of office space and clerical help by DCS and counties.

DCS may provide office space and clerical help wherever needed. The counties of this state shall cooperate in this respect and, wherever possible, shall furnish office space if needed.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 18; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “DCS” for “The department” in the first sentence of this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-43.
Liberal construction of article.

This article shall be liberally construed so that its purposes may be achieved.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 20; Code 1981, §

42-8-43

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, redesignated former Code Section 42-8-44 as present Code Section 42-8-43. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 42-8-43 (Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 15; Ga. L. 1972, p. 604, § 11), relating to effect of article on existing county probation systems, was repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310, effective July 1, 2015.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-43.1 through 42-8-43.3.
[Repealed]

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-43.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1605, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 421, § 1; Code 1981, § 42-8-43.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1319, § 1; Code 1981, § 42-8-43.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1951, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310, effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 repeal of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-44.
Redesignated.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310, effective July 1, 2015, redesignated former Code Section 42-8-44 as present Code Section 42-8-43.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).